Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.06.050

Abandonment—Election.

The proposal for abandonment of a plan of government as authorized in RCW 35A.06.030 and for adoption of the plan named in the resolution or petition shall be voted upon at the next general election in accordance with RCW 29A.04.330, or at a special election held prior to the next general election in accordance with the resolution of the legislative body. The ballot title and statement of the proposition shall be prepared by the city attorney as provided in RCW 35A.29.120.

[ 2009 c 7 s 1; 2004 c 268 s 2; 1994 c 223 s 29; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 15; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.06.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 7: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [February 18, 2009]." [ 2009 c 7 s 2.]

Effective date—2004 c 268: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 268 s 3.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.